Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-107
Bonds; election; issuance; payment; laws applicable.

So far as applicable sections 10-401 to 10-405 shall govern the proceedings to submit such proposition, issue bonds, and provide for payment of the same; Provided, section 57-106 shall not apply to the counties of Burt, Washington and Sarpy.

G.S.1873, c. 13, § 2, p. 250;

R.S.1913, § 4014;

C.S.1922, § 3417;

C.S.1929, § 57-107;

R.S.1943, § 57-107.